Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.122

Collective bargaining agreements—Binding arbitration.

Subject to RCW 41.58.070, a collective bargaining agreement may provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a collective bargaining agreement.

[ 2021 c 13 s 2; 2019 c 230 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22; 1973 c 59 s 2.]